Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Annual Conference of Representatives

§ 43-5-31.
Annual conference of representatives of state and other agencies.

The Department of Education, hereinafter called “department,” shall annually call a conference of representatives of state agencies, other governmental and private agencies, and institutions in the manner set forth by Sections 43-5-31 through 43-5-39 for the general purpose of the coordination of programs relating to the training, education and assistance of blind and deaf citizens of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 151, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-5-33.
Appointment of director of conference.

The State Superintendent of Education shall appoint a director for this conference who may be an employee of the department or an employee of either the School for the Deaf or the School for the Blind.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 333, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 152, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-5-35.
Notice of conference.

The director shall publish notification of the conference in the following manner:

Not less than thirty (30) days prior to the date of the conference the director shall mail notices of this meeting to the executive officer of any agency or institution of the State of Mississippi which, in the opinion of the board, is charged with or can contribute to the education, training or assistance of blind or deaf citizens of the State of Mississippi. It shall be the duty of such executive officer upon receipt of such notification to attend or appoint an officer or employee of his agency to attend and participate in the conference.

The notice required by this subsection shall include time and place of the conference and reference to Sections 43-5-31 through 43-5-39 regarding the required attendance of a representative from a designated agency.

The director shall cause notice to be published in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation throughout the state. Such notice shall appear at least three (3) times with the first publication appearing not less than twenty-five (25) days prior to the date of the conference and the last publication appearing not more than five (5) days prior to the date of the conference.

The director is directed and authorized to utilize any mass communication media that may be available at no cost to the board to publicize the conference.

The director shall notify private organizations and persons known to have an interest in the education, training and assistance of the deaf and blind of the meeting and to invite their attendance and participation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 333, § 3, eff from and after Jan 1, 1975.

§ 43-5-37.
Duties of conference director.

The director shall arrange and organize the conference and is charged specifically with the following duties regarding the conference:

The director shall arrange for a meeting hall, seating, public address systems and appurtenant equipment and supplies.

The director shall organize the program and set an agenda for the conference.

The director is authorized to arrange meetings of groups who are concerned with the problems of the blind or the deaf. Such meeting may be held before or during the conference; however, there shall be at least one (1) general session of all participants during the conference.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 333, § 4, eff from and after Jan 1, 1975.

§ 43-5-39.
Report of activities and findings of conference.

The board shall include a report of the activities and findings of the conference in the annual report of the Mississippi School for the Deaf and the Mississippi School for the Blind.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 333, § 5, eff from and after Jan 1, 1975.